District of Columbia statutes.
16-532

Other remedies of judgment creditor.

Nothing herein contained deprives a judgment creditor of the right to file a civil action to enforce his judgment against an equitable interest in real or personal estate of the judgment defendant, or to have a conveyance of the real or personal estate by the defendant, made with intent to hinder, delay, and defraud his creditors, set aside.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 16-532.
1973 Ed., § 16-532.

Prior Codifications